District of Columbia statutes.
7-246

Criminal penalties for unlawful use or disclosure.

A person who knowingly obtains, uses, or discloses health and human services information in a manner not authorized by this chapter or other District law shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $2,500, imprisoned not more than 60 days, or both; except, that if the offense is committed through deception or theft the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than $5,000, imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both.

Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 106, 57 DCR 7171
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 53(a), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 106 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 106 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).